California statutes. Education Code
In addition to the amounts set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 69613.4, for each of the four years of classroom instruction referenced in subdivision (a) of Section 69613.4, the following loan assumption benefits shall be granted:

(a) One thousand dollars ($1,000) of additional liability per year shall be assumed for a person who holds a credential appropriate for teaching, and who teaches, mathematics, science, or special education in the lowest 60 percentile of Academic Performance Index rankings.

(b) One thousand dollars ($1,000) of additional liability per year shall be assumed for a person who teaches in a school in the lowest two deciles on the Academic Performance Index rankings. Eligibility for the benefit set forth in this subdivision shall be limited to a person who holds a credential appropriate for teaching, and who teaches, mathematics, science, or special education.

(c) Not more than a total of five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be expended in any academic year for the purposes of this section.

(d) The commission shall award benefits payable under this section upon receipt of all documentation necessary to establish eligibility for the additional loan assumption benefits. Payments shall be made to applicants in the order received until the five million dollars ($5,000,000) authorized by subdivision (c) has been expended.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69614.

(a) The commission shall distribute program information and student applications to participate in the loan assumption program to each eligible institution and to each school district or county office of education operating a district intern program pursuant to Section 44381. Each eligible institution shall receive at least one allocation, and the remainder shall be distributed to eligible institutions proportionate to the number of teaching candidates from each institution who completed the coursework required for a teaching credential based on the most recent data available from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. In addition, the commission shall reexamine its outreach and marketing strategies to inform both potential undergraduates and persons employed outside of academia about the availability and benefits of the loan assumption program. To this end, the commission shall enlist the advice and support of the California Center for the Teaching Profession, the University of California, the California State University, the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities, and private employers and their associations throughout the state.

(b) Each eligible institution, school district, and county office of education shall sign an institutional agreement with the commission, certifying its intent to administer the loan assumption program according to all applicable published rules, regulations, and guidelines, and to make special efforts to notify students regarding the availability of the program, particularly economically disadvantaged students.

(c) To the extent feasible, each eligible institution shall coordinate the loan assumption program with other programs designed to recruit students to enter the teaching profession.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69615.

(a) The commission shall administer this article, and shall adopt rules and regulations for that purpose. The rules and regulations shall include, but need not be limited to, provisions regarding the period of time during which an agreement shall remain valid, the reallocation of resources in light of agreements that are not utilized by program participants, the failure, for any reason, of a program participant to complete a minimum of four consecutive years of classroom instruction, and the development of projections for funding purposes.

(b) The commission shall solicit the advice of representatives from postsecondary education institutions, the State Department of Education, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, school districts, and county offices of education regarding proposed rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 583, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

69615.6.

(a) For each school year, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The commission shall enter into agreements for the assumption of up to 6,500 student loans for program participants eligible under this article.

(2) Priority for these agreements shall be given to applicants who are recipients of federally subsidized loans or other need-based loans, as determined by the commission.

(3) Priority for these agreements shall be given to applicants who agree to obtain, or who have obtained, a teaching credential in mathematics, science, or special education.

(b) In any school year, the commission may enter into no more than 100 agreements with applicants who participate in a district intern program operated by a school district or a county office of education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

69615.8.

Notwithstanding any other law, in any fiscal year, the commission shall award no more than the number of loan assumption agreements that are authorized by the Governor and the Legislature in the annual Budget Act for that year for the assumption of loans pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 516, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.1. Golden State Teacher Grant Program [69617. - 69617.5.]

69617.

(a) (1) (A) Subject to moneys appropriated by the Legislature for purposes of this section, the commission shall administer the Golden State Teacher Grant Program. Under the program, the commission shall provide one-time grant funds of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) to each student enrolled, or who has applied for enrollment, between January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2024, inclusive, in a professional preparation program leading to a preliminary teaching credential or a pupil personnel services credential, at either a qualifying institution, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, or a professional preparation program approved by the Commission on Teaching Credentialing that has a main campus location or administrative entity that resides in California, including
 professional preparation programs operated by local educational agencies in California, if the student commits to working at a priority school or a California preschool program for four years within the eight years following the date the student completes the professional preparation program.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), for applications received under the program beginning on July 1, 2024, the commission shall provide reduced one-time grant funds of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to each student enrolled, or who has applied for enrollment, on or after July 1, 2024, in a professional preparation program leading to a preliminary teaching credential in a high-need field or a pupil personnel services credential, at either a qualifying institution, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, or a professional preparation program approved by the Commission on Teaching Credentialing that has a main campus location or
 administrative entity that resides in California, including professional preparation programs operated by local educational agencies in California, except teacher intern credential program participants, if the student commits to working at a priority school or a California preschool program for two years within the four years following the date the student completes the professional preparation program.

(C) (i) Beginning on July 1, 2026, for applications received under the program and funded through local assistance support from federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds, the commission shall provide one-time grants of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) to each student enrolled, or who has applied for enrollment, on or after July 1, 2026, in a professional preparation program leading to a preliminary
 special education credential, at either a qualifying institution, as defined in subdivision (l) of Section 69432.7, or a professional preparation program approved by the Commission on Teaching Credentialing that has a main campus location or administrative entity that resides in California, including professional preparation programs operated by local educational agencies in California, except teacher intern credential program participants, if the student commits to working at a priority school or a California preschool program for four years within the eight years following the date the student completes the professional preparation program.

(ii) The commission may, upon approval from the Department of Finance, use moneys from the General Fund to provide grants prescribed by clause (i) in the event that federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds transfers to the commission are delayed. Once federal
 Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds are received, the commission shall reimburse the General Fund moneys used pursuant to this clause on a quarterly basis within the same fiscal year.

(2) (A) Under the program, the commission shall provide one-time grant funds of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to each California resident student enrolled, or who has applied for enrollment, between January 1, 2020, to June 30, 2024, inclusive, in a professional preparation program leading to a preliminary teaching credential in a high-need field or pupil personnel services credential at a qualified institution, as determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Section 69617.5, if the student commits to working at a priority school or a California preschool program for four years within the eight
 years following the date the student completes the professional preparation program.

(B) Except as provided in subparagraph (C), for applications received beginning on July 1, 2024, under the program, the commission shall provide reduced one-time grant funds of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) to each student eligible for a grant pursuant to subparagraph (A), except teacher intern credential program participants, if the student commits to working at a priority school or a California preschool program for two years within the four years following the date the student completes the professional preparation program.

(C) (i) Beginning on July 1, 2026, for applications received under the program and funded through local assistance support from federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds, the commission shall provide one-time grants of up to ten
 thousand dollars ($10,000) to each student enrolled, or who has applied for enrollment, on or after July 1, 2026, in a professional preparation program leading to a preliminary
 special education credential at a qualified institution, as determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing pursuant to Section 69617.5, except teacher intern credential program participants, if the student commits to working at a priority school or a California preschool program for four years within the eight years following the date the student completes the professional preparation program.

(ii) The commission may, upon approval from the Department of Finance, use moneys from the General Fund to provide grants prescribed by clause (i) in the event that federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds transfers to the commission are delayed. Once federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act funds are received, the commission shall reimburse the General Fund moneys used pursuant to this clause on a quarterly basis within the same fiscal year.

(D) Of the funds appropriated in support of the program, no more than 8 percent of the total funding may be allocated for the purpose of awards provided pursuant to this paragraph.

(3) (A) Funds appropriated for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program in the Budget Act of 2020 and the Budget Act of 2021 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the commission until June 30, 2026.

(B) Funds appropriated for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program in the Budget Act of 2025 and the Budget Act of 2026 shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure by the commission until June 30, 2029.

(C) For applications submitted to the commission in the 2023–24 fiscal year, the commission shall issue no more than fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) in grants pursuant to this section.

(4) Grant funds shall be used to supplement and not supplant other sources of grant financial aid, and may be disbursed in more than one academic year, provided that the total amount of funds granted to an applicant does not exceed the applicable amount specified in this section.

(b) The one-time grant funds issued pursuant to this section shall not exceed the amount appropriated for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program in the Budget Act of 2020 and the Budget Act of 2021.

(c) Commencing July 1, 2024, the commission shall prioritize awards to eligible applicants with the lowest income and asset levels at the time of application. Income and asset levels shall be calculated using the same methodology set forth for the Student Aid Index.

(d) (1) A grant recipient shall agree to serve at a priority school or a California preschool program for two or four years, as applicable, and shall have four or eight years, as applicable, upon completion of the recipient’s professional preparation program, to meet that obligation. Except as provided in paragraph (4), a grant recipient shall agree to repay the state 50 or 25 percent, as applicable, of the total received grant funds annually, up to full repayment of the received grant funds, for each year the recipient fails to do one or more of the following:

(A) Be enrolled in or have successfully completed a professional preparation program approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(B) While enrolled in the professional preparation program, maintain good academic standing.

(C) Before or upon
 completion of the professional preparation program, complete a baccalaureate degree program from a regionally accredited institution of higher education.

(D) Complete the required teaching service or clinical practice following completion of the recipient’s professional preparation program.

(E) Complete their teacher preparation program and earn a preliminary credential within six years after the first distribution of grant funds.

(2) Nonperformance of the commitment to serve at a priority school or a California preschool program for the applicable two or four years shall be certified by the commission.

(3) Nonperformance of the commitment to earn a preliminary teaching credential, pupil personnel services credential, or
 preliminary special education credential shall be certified by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing to the Student Aid Commission.

(4) Any exceptions to the requirement for repayment shall be defined by the commission, and may include, but shall not be limited to, counting a school year towards the required applicable service requirement at a priority school or a California preschool program if a grant recipient is unable to complete the school year when any of the following occur:

(A) The grant recipient has completed at least one-half of the school year or preschool program year, as applicable.

(B) The employer deems the grant recipient to have fulfilled the grant recipient’s contractual requirements for the school year or preschool program year, as applicable, for
 purposes of salary increases, probationary or permanent status, and retirement.

(C) The grant recipient was not able to serve due to the financial circumstances of the school district, including a decision to not reelect the employee for the next succeeding school year.

(D) The grant recipient has a condition covered under the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.) or similar state law.

(E) The grant recipient was called or ordered to active duty status for more than 30 days as a member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States.

(e) The commission shall develop a process by which students interested in a professional preparation program leading to a preliminary teaching credential or a pupil
 personnel services credential may submit a request for a preenrollment conditional award notice from the commission. The notice shall provide information regarding the Golden State Teacher Grant Program award amount the student may be eligible to receive upon enrollment in the professional preparation program and formal application to the commission to participate in the Golden State Teacher Grant Program.

(f) (1) A “priority school” means a school with 55 percent or more of its pupils being unduplicated pupils, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02.

(2) A “high-need field” means a field designated as a having the most significant shortages by the commission and may include any of the following:

(A) Credentials issued in conjunction with a bilingual or computer science
 authorization.

(B) Mathematics, science, or technology credentials.

(C) Special education credentials.

(3) The commission, in coordination with the State Department of Education, shall publish a list of priority schools by April 15 of each year.

(4) For purposes of satisfying the service requirement, a grant recipient may use service at a school listed on the most recent list of priority schools published by the commission that is available when the grant recipient seeks employment at a priority school. Further service at that school shall continue to satisfy the applicable service requirement, even if the school is no longer included on future priority school lists.

(g) (1) The commission may adopt regulations, including any amendments to regulations, necessary for the implementation of the Golden State Teacher Grant Program. The commission may adopt emergency regulations it deems necessary for the implementation of this program, in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). For purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of those regulations or amendments to those regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare, notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law and without further compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act
 (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), any emergency regulations and amendments to the emergency regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall remain in force and effect until June 30, 2030.

(3) No rule, policy, or standard of general application issued by the commission in implementing this section shall be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(h) The commission shall conduct, in partnership with the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, an evaluation of the Golden State Teacher Grant Program to determine the effectiveness of the program in recruiting credential candidates and employing credentialholders at priority schools and California preschool programs. The commission is
 encouraged to use qualitative and quantitative measures to quantify the number of credential candidates the program recruited into professional preparation programs, disaggregated by program and institution type, and the number of credentialholders employed at priority schools and California preschool programs, disaggregated by subject matter placement, and to describe the effects of the program on the decisions of credential candidates to enter and remain in the education field. The commission shall provide, with respect to the evaluation, a report to the Department of Finance and the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature on or before December 31, 2025, and every two years thereafter.

(i) (1) The commission shall accept applications for the Golden State Teacher Grant Program beginning on September 1 for the following academic year and shall establish a process and timeline that allows institutions of
 higher education to provide applicants with grant eligibility determinations before the deadline for enrolling in their professional preparation program.

(2) Commencing July 1, 2024, the commission shall establish up to three application periods each year, consistent with subdivision (a).

(j) The commission shall permit grant recipients to receive funds in more than one academic year, provided the total amount of funds granted to any applicant does not exceed the applicable amount specified in this section.

(k) As used in this section, “California preschool program” means a state-funded or federally funded preschool program in the state, including California state preschool programs, tribal preschool programs, and Head Start programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 33.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

69617.5.

(a) The Legislature finds that the state’s teaching crisis requires immediate and targeted action that also increases diversity among classroom teachers.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 69617, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may determine that a private postsecondary educational institution is a qualifying institution for purposes of the program established pursuant to Section 69617, if the institution meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The institution offers a professional preparation program approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as of January 1, 2023.

(2) The institution was originally chartered and is
 currently operating as a nonprofit entity that offers services exclusively online to California residents.

(3) The institution is either accredited by the Senior Colleges and Universities Commission of the Western Association of Schools and Colleges or is regionally accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(4) The institution participates in the federal Pell Grant program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070a), and in at least two of the following federal student aid programs:

(A) Federal Work-Study Program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1087–51).

(B) Federal Stafford Loan Program.

(C) Federal Supplemental Educational Opportunity Grant Program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1070b).

(5) The institution has a federal student loan cohort default rate below 10 percent.

(6) The institution reports the degree to which enrolled students participating in this program complete the program and become licensed to teach in California within 24 months, and the average time to program completion.

(7) The institution has an established labor union student chapter that provides a pathway to union membership to students upon graduation.

(8) (A) It is the intent of the Legislature that the institution is in compliance with any applicable provisions of the California Private Postsecondary Education Act of 2009 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 94800) of Part 59 of Division 10).

(B) If the institution has no physical presence in California, the institution shall contract with the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education to respond to California resident student complaints pursuant to Section 94874.9.

(c) The requirements described in subdivision (b) shall be demonstrated in a manner to be determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, which may include consultation with the State Board of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 195, Sec. 3.   (SB 142)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.5. Graduate Assumption Program of Loans for Education [69618. - 69619.]

69618.

(a) The Legislature hereby recognizes the growing need for new faculty members at California’s colleges and universities. This need will be fueled largely by two factors: (1) the large number of current faculty approaching retirement age who will need to be replaced; and (2) the expected growth in enrollment demand in California.

(b) The Legislature finds that the rising costs of higher education, coupled with a shift in available financial aid from scholarships and grants to loans, make loan repayment options an important consideration in student’s decision to pursue a graduate education.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Graduate Assumption Program of Loans for Education be designed to encourage persons to complete their graduate educations and serve as faculty at an accredited California college or university.

(d) As used in this article, “commission” means the Student Aid Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.1.

(a) Program participants shall meet all of the following eligibility criteria prior to selection in the program and shall continue to meet these criteria, as appropriate, during the payment periods:

(1) The participant shall be a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen.

(2) The participant shall be a California resident attending an eligible school or college.

(3) The participant shall be making satisfactory academic progress.

(4) The participant shall have complied with United States Selective Service requirements.

(5) The participant shall not owe a refund on any state or federal educational grant or have delinquent or defaulted student loans.

(b) Any person enrolled in an institution of postsecondary education and participating in the loan assumption program set forth in this article may be eligible to receive a conditional warrant for loan assumption, to be redeemed pursuant to Section 69618.2 upon becoming employed as a full-time faculty member at a California college or university or the equivalent of full-time service as a faculty member employed part-time at two or more California colleges or universities.

(c) (1) The commission shall award warrants to students with demonstrated academic ability and financial need, as determined by the commission pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 69503).

(2) The applicant shall have completed a baccalaureate degree program or be enrolled in an academic program leading to a baccalaureate level or a graduate level degree.

(3) The applicant shall be currently enrolled in or admitted to a program in which he or she will be enrolled on at least a half-time basis each academic term as defined by an eligible institution. The applicant shall agree to maintain satisfactory academic progress.

(4) The applicant shall have been judged by his or her postsecondary institution to have outstanding ability on the basis of criteria that may include, but need not be limited to, any of the following:

(A) Grade point average.

(B) Test scores.

(C) Faculty evaluations.

(D) Interviews.

(E) Other recommendations.

(5) In order to meet the costs of obtaining a graduate degree, the applicant shall have received, or be approved to receive, a loan under one or more of the following designated loan programs:

(A) The Federal Family Education Loan Program (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1071 et seq.).

(B) Any loan program approved by the commission.

(6) The applicant shall have agreed to teach on a full-time basis at one or more accredited California colleges or universities for at least three consecutive years after obtaining a graduate degree.

(7) An applicant who teaches on less than a full-time basis may participate in the program, but is not eligible for loan repayment until that person teaches for the equivalent of a full-time academic year.

(d) A person participating in the program pursuant to this section shall not receive more than one warrant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 460, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.2.

The commission shall redeem an applicant’s warrant and commence loan assumption payments as specified in Section 69618.3 upon verification that the applicant has fulfilled all of the following:

(a) The applicant has received a graduate degree from an accredited, participating institution.

(b) The applicant has provided the equivalent of full-time instruction at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities for one academic year or the equivalent.

(c) The applicant has met the requirements of the warrant and all other conditions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 460, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.3.

The terms of the loan assumptions granted under this article shall be as follows, subject to the specific terms of each warrant:

(a) After a program participant has completed one academic year, or the equivalent of full-time teaching, at one or more regionally accredited, eligible California colleges or universities, the Student Aid Commission shall assume up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated loan programs. The initial year of eligible teaching shall begin within 10 years of receiving an initial conditional warrant from the commission.

(b) After the program participant has completed two consecutive academic years, or the equivalent of full-time teaching, at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities, the commission shall assume up to an additional two thousand dollars ($2,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to four thousand dollars ($4,000).

(c) After a program participant has completed three consecutive academic years, or the equivalent of full-time teaching, at one or more regionally accredited California colleges or universities, the commission shall assume up to an additional two thousand dollars ($2,000) of the participant’s outstanding liability under one or more of the designated loan programs, for a total loan assumption of up to six thousand dollars ($6,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 460, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.4.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), in the event that a program participant fails to complete a minimum of three consecutive academic years of teaching as required by this article, under the terms of the agreement pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (c) of Section 69618.1, the participant shall assume full liability for all student loan obligations remaining after the commission’s assumption of loan liability for the last academic year of qualifying instruction pursuant to Section 69618.3.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the event that a program participant becomes unable to complete one of the three consecutive years of teaching service due to a serious illness, pregnancy, or other natural causes, the participant shall receive a deferral of the resumption of full liability for the loan for a period not to exceed one academic year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.5.

(a) The commission shall accept nominations from accredited colleges and universities made pursuant to Section 69618.1.

(b) The commission shall choose from among those nominations deemed financially needy with outstanding student loans pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 69503) based upon criteria that may include the following:

(1) Grades at the undergraduate level in the subject field in which the student intends to complete graduate work.

(2) Grades in the undergraduate program.

(3) Aptitude for graduate work in the subject fields.

(4) General aptitude for graduate study.

(5) Critical human resource needs.

(c) The commission may develop additional criteria for the selection of award recipients consistent with the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.6.

The commission shall administer this article, and shall adopt rules and regulations for that purpose. The rules and regulations shall include, but need not be limited to, provisions regarding the period of time for which a warrant shall remain valid and the development of projections for funding purposes. In developing these rules and regulations, the commission shall solicit the advice of representatives from postsecondary education institutions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.7.

The commission shall work in conjunction with lenders participating in the Federal Family Education Loan Program to develop a streamlined application process for participation in the program set forth in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69618.9.

Commencing with the 1998–99 fiscal year, the commission shall issue warrants for the assumption of up to 500 student loans for program participants eligible under this article. The issuance of warrants shall be subject to funding to be provided in the annual Budget Act for each fiscal year. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no warrants for the assumption of loans under this article shall be issued in the 2003–04 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 227, Sec. 28.   Effective August 11, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

69619.

It is the intent of the Legislature that, commencing with the 1998–99 fiscal year, funding necessary for the administration of this student loan assumption program shall be included within the annual budget of the commission in an amount necessary to meet the student loan obligations incurred by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 330, Sec. 32.   Effective August 21, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Child Development Teacher and Supervisor Grant Program [69620. - 69628.]

69620.

There is hereby established the Child Development Teacher and Supervisor Grant Program, to be administered by the Student Aid Commission, with participation by students attending California public or private two-year or four-year postsecondary educational institutions who intend to teach or supervise in the field of child care and development in a licensed children’s center. The Student Aid Commission may enter into an agreement with another state or local agency to administer this program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69621.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Child Development Permit” means a permit issued by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing that authorizes an individual to teach, instruct, or supervise in a licensed child care and development program.

(b) “Licensed children’s center” means a public school district-based, nonprofit community-based, or private proprietary program licensed by the State Department of Social Services under the health and safety requirements of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations or administered by the State Department of Education under Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations. Licensed children’s centers include federally subsidized, state-subsidized, and nonsubsidized child care and development programs serving children part day or full day.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

69622.

(a) Participants shall be enrolled in an approved course of study leading to the teacher, site supervisor, or program director level of the Child Development Permit.

(b) An applicant shall be eligible to participate if he or she meets one of the following criteria:

(1) Is nominated by a postsecondary institution.

(2) Is nominated by his or her employing agency that holds an approved waiver of staffing qualifications on behalf of the applicant.

(c) From the list of applicants who are eligible under subdivisions (a) and (b), the Student Aid Commission, or an agency designated by the commission, shall select participants on the basis of their demonstrated financial need and academic achievement, which may include, but not be limited to, high school grade-point average, college grade-point average, or academic test scores.

(d) Participants shall maintain no less than half-time enrollment and satisfactory academic progress as defined by the postsecondary educational institution.

(e) Recipients of a grant may renew their participation by maintaining satisfactory academic progress, financial need, and intent to pursue the approved course of study leading to the teacher, site supervisor, or program director level as provided in subdivision (a). The maximum amount any one recipient may receive through the grant program is six thousand dollars ($6,000).

(f) Participants may not concurrently receive benefits from the grant program under this article and from the Child Development Teacher Loan Assumption Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69623.

(a) To receive a grant under this article, a participant shall enter into a contractual agreement with the Student Aid Commission under which the participant agrees to do all of the following:

(1) Pursue a course of study leading to the Child Development Permit at the teacher, site supervisor, or program director level.

(2) Maintain full-time employment in a licensed children’s center in California for a period of one year for each year in which grant assistance was received and provide the Student Aid Commission with evidence of compliance with this requirement.

(b) Each participant shall complete and return to the Student Aid Commission an employment verification for each year of service as a teacher, instructor, or supervisor. A year of employment may be based on a calendar year or a school year.

(c) The Student Aid Commission shall develop appropriate mechanisms to document and report annually to the State Department of Education regarding compliance with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

69624.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that up to 100 new grants be awarded each year, or that the maximum number of grants be based on the amount of federal funds available from the Child Development Block Grant Act of 1990 (P.L. 97-35).

(b) (1) Grants shall be awarded in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each academic year if the participant is enrolled at least one-half time in a four-year institution.
